Oklahoma, session 2026, SB552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 52 of Title 74, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For purposes of this section:
1. “Biotechnology company of concern” means an entity
designated by the federal government to be under the control of a
foreign adversary and that poses a risk to national security based
on the company’s research of multiomic data collection; and
2. “Multiomics” means a biological analysis method that
combines data from multiple research areas, including, but not
limited to, genomics, transcriptomics, proteomics, epigenomics, and
metabolomics in order to gain a comprehensive understanding of
complex biological processes.

B. Any state agency that receives federal or state funds shall
not be authorized to use or procure any biotechnology equipment or
service that originates from a company designated by the federal
government to be a biotechnology company of concern nor shall any
such state agency contract with an entity that uses or procures such
biotechnology.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon the enactment of a
federal law that prohibits entities that receive federal funds from
using biotechnology that is from a company associated with a foreign
adversary.
ENR. S. B. NO. 552 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 13th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 552 Page 3